Hawaii, session 2026, GM1284.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the enterprise zone
program was established in 1986 for the purpose of stimulating
business, agricultural, and industrial growth in areas to
revitalize neighborhoods by providing public benefits to local
companies. In addition to stimulating business activity, the
enterprise zone program also promotes job preservation ■ and job
creation in areas designated by the counties and approved by the
governor. Benefits for local companies include permitting and
zoning assistance, fee waivers, tax relief, and more.
The legislature further finds that the most common
industries participating in the enterprise zone program are
agricultural production or processing, manufacturing, and
wholesaling. Other eligible industries include aviation or
maritime repair or maintenance; telecommunication switching and
delivery; information technology design and production; medical
research, clinical trials, and telemedicine; for-profit tra-ining
2026-2431 SB2360 GDI SMA-2.docx
lilMBMiinilllllllllM

Page 2
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
programs in international business management or environmental
remediation; biotechnology research, development, production, or
sales; repair or maintenance of assistive technology equipment
used by persons with disabilities; certain call centers; and
wind energy production.
The legislature additionally finds that, for decades, a
manufacturer of tangible products has only been eligible for
enterprise zone program benefits if over one-half of the gross
sales of its products are to wholesalers and the sale takes
place within the enterprise zone. This qualification was
established before modern innovations in manufacturing and
retail sales. Since the program’s establishment, business
models have significantly changed, and local manufacturers now
often skip selling to wholesalers and go directly to retail,
making those manufacturers ineligible to participate in the
enterprise zone program. Allowing local manufacturers that sell
directly to retail to be eligible for the enterprise zone
program will help lift local businesses and promote job creation
and job preservation for local families looking to thrive in
Hawaii.
2026-2431 SB2360 GDI SMA-2.docx 2
MIIIIHIIIHlIHIIIHIIinillllM

Page 3 2360
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
Accordingly, the purpose of this part is to modernize the
enterprise zone program by:
Allowing additional activities within an enterprise
zone to qualify for enterprise zone benefits,
specifically:
(A) Retail activity by a local manufacturer made
within the enterprise zone;
(B) The processing of value-added agriculture
products;
Research, development, sale, or production of all
types of medical products and medical and health
care services;
(D) Activities of the Hawaii food and product
innovation network;
(E) The provision of professional services by health
care professionals in health care-related
sectors;
(F) Research and development of aerospace technology;
and
(G) Information technology design and production
services;
2026-2431 SB2360 CDl SMA-2.docx 3

Page 4 2360
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
(2) Authorizing the department of business, economic
development, and tourism to declare up to two census
tracts on state land that contain an innovation
enterprise to be designated as an enterprise zone,
subject to the governor's approval; and
(3) Requiring the department of business, economic
development, and tourism to conduct a comprehensive
review, in consultation with the department of
taxation, of the state enterprise zones program and
report to the legislature.
SECTION 2. Section 209E-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By adding four new definitions to be appropriately
inserted and to read:
""Hawaii food and product innovation network" means an
entity engaged in research, development, testing, production, or
commercialization of proprietary or novel food products,
including food processing technologies, value-added food
products derived from agricultural crops, and food science and
nutrition research with commercial applications; provided that
2026-2431 SB2360 CDl SMA-2.docx
lilllHIIINilllllHHIIIIIIi

Page 5 S.B. NO. sT,
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
the entity's primary business activity involves such research,
development, testing, production, or commercialization.
"Innovation enterprise" means an area located on property
owned by the State that is intended to support, or currently
contains, businesses primarily engaged in space domain
awareness; information technology design and production
services; aerospace, medical technology, biomedical, or life
sciences research and development; clinical trials; or
pharmaceutical manufacturing.
"Tangible personal property" means property that can be
touched or felt and relocated. "Tangible personal property"
does not include electricity, real property, or intellectual
property.
"Value-added agricultural product" means a product that has
been processed, enhanced, or otherwise modified beyond its raw
state in a manner that increases its economic value."
2. By amending the definition of "eligible business
activity" to read:
""Eligible business activity" means the:
(1) Manufacture of tangible personal property, the
wholesale sale of tangible personal property as
2026-2431 SB2360 GDI SMA-2.docx 5
IIIliWIIIIIMIIIIIHIIIIini

Page 6 2360
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
described in section 237-4, the sale of tangible
personal property manufactured and sold at retail in
an ent^r£rise zone for consumpt ion or use by th^
purchaser and not for resale, or a service business as
defined in this section;
(2) Production of agricultural products where the business
is a producer as defined in section 237-5, or the
processing of agricultural products[—] or value-added
agricultural products, all or some of which were grown
within an enterprise zone;
(3) Research, development, sale, or production of [a-l^]2_
(A) All types of [gGnetiGally-cnginccrcd] medical,
agricultural, or maritime biotechnology products;
[et] and
(B) Medical and health care services;
(4) Production of electric power from wind energy for sale
primarily to a public utility company for resale to
the public;
(5) Activities of the Hawaii food and product innovation
network;
2026-2431 SB2360 GDI SMA-2.docx
BIIIKIIillllllllliniHISIIIIIIII

Page 7 2360
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
(6) The provision of professional services by health care
professionals in health care-related sectors,
including but not limited to home health care
agencies, specialized care practices, and health
coaching;
(7) Research and development of aerospace technology; or
(8) Information technology design and production services;
provided that medical cannabis dispensary activities pursuant to
chapter 329D shall not be considered an eligible business
activity for the purposes of this chapter."
SECTION 3. Section 209E-4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§209E-4 Enterprise zone designation. (a) The governing
body of any county may apply in writing to the department to
have an area declared to be an enterprise zone. The application
shall include a description of the location of the area or areas
in question, and a general statement identifying proposed local
incentives to complement the state and any federal incentives.
(b) The governor, upon the recommendation of the director,
shall approve the designation of up to six areas in each county
as enterprise zones for a period of twenty years. Any such area
2026-2431 SB2360 CDl SMA-2.docx
liiiiiiiMiiiiiiiimiiiinaM

Page 8
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
shall be located in one United States census tract or two or
more contiguous United States census tracts in accordance with
the most recent decennial United States Census. The census
tract or tracts within which each enterprise zone is located
also shall meet at least one of the following criteria:
(1) Twenty-five per cent or more of the population have
incomes below eighty per cent of the median family
income of the county; or
(2) The unemployment rate is 1.5 times the state average.
(c) The department may declare up to two census tracts on
state land that contain an innovation enterprise to be
designated as an enterprise zone, subject to the governor's
approval; provided that, notwithstanding any other provision of
this section, the designation of census tracts pursuant to this
subsection may be made without regard to county application
requirements, geographic limitations, or eligibility criteria
otherwise applicable to enterprise zones under this chapter."
SECTION 4. (a) The department of business, economic
development, and tourism, in consultation with the department of
taxation, shall conduct a comprehensive review of the state
2026-2431 SB2360 CDl SMA-2.docx 8
iiiiiiiimiiiiieiiEiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 9
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
enterprise zones program established under chapter 209E, Hawaii
Revised Statutes.
(b) The comprehensive review shall include:
(1) An evaluation of the economic impact of the program,
including the number of jobs created and the types of
industries supported;
(2) An assessment of whether existing enterprise zones
continue to meet the statutory eligibility criteria
for designation; and
(3) Revenues generated by participating companies for each
county.
(c) The department of business, economic development, and
tourism shall submit a report of its findings to the legislature
no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular
session of 2027.
PART II
SECTION 5. This part shall apply to business firms that
are designated as a qualified business for the purposes of
chapter 209E, Hawaii Revised Statutes, on or after July 1, 2026.
SECTION 6. Section 209E-9, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
2026-2431 SB2360 CDl SMA-2.docx 9
nilNIlillilllllllllNIBMIII

Page 10
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
"(b) A business firm may also be eligible to be designated
a qualified business for purposes of this chapter if the
business:
(1) Is actively engaged in the conduct of a trade or
business in an eligible business activity in an area
immediately fee] before the area being
designated an enterprise zone;
(2) Meets the requirements of subsection (a)(2); and
(3) Either:
(A) Increases its average annual number of full-time
employees employed at the business' establishment
or establishments within enterprise zones located
within the same county by at least ten per cent
by the end of the first year of operation, and by
at least fifteen per cent by the end of each of
the fourth, fifth, sixth, [end] seventh, eighth,
and ninth years of operation, and for businesses
eligible for tax credits extending past the
[seventh] ninth year, at least maintains that
higher level of employment during each subsequent
taxable year; provided that the percentage
2026-2431 SB2360 CDl SMA-2.docx 10
iiiiiiiiniiiniiiinHwiinnii

O r> M
S.B. NO. 2360
S.D.1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
increase shall be based upon the employee count
at the beginning of the initial year of operation
within the enterprise zone or zones; or
(B) Increases its gross sales of agricultural crops
produced, or agricultural products processed
within enterprise zones located within the same
county by two per cent annually."
SECTION 7. Section 209E-10, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsection (a) to read:
" (a) The department shall certify annually to the
department of taxation the applicability of the tax credit
provided in this chapter for a qualified business against any
taxes due the State. Except for the general excise tax, the
credit shall be eighty per cent of the tax due for the first tax
year, seventy per cent of the tax due for the second tax year,
sixty per cent of the tax due for the third tax year, fifty per
cent of the tax due ^or the fourth t^x year, forty per cent of
the tax due for the fifth tax year, thirty per cent of the tax
due for the sixth t^ year, and twenty per cent of the tax due
for each of the seventh [year-;], eighth, and ninth tax years.
2026-2431 SB2360 CDl SMA-2.docx 1
iiniiimimwiBiNiiiNMn

Page 12 2360
S.B. NO
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
For qualified businesses engaged in the manufacturing of
tangible personal property or the producing or processing of
agricultural products, the credit shall continue after the
[oGvcnth] ninth tax year at the rate of twenty per cent of the
tax due for each of the subsequent three tax years. Any tax
credit not usable shall not be applied to future tax years."
2. By amending subsection (c) to read:
"(c) In addition to any tax credit authorized under this
section, any qualified business shall be entitled to a tax
credit against any taxes due the State in an amount equal to a
percentage of unemployment taxes paid. The amount of the credit
shall be equal to eighty per cent of the unemployment taxes paid
during the first tax year, seventy per cent of the taxes paid
during the second tax year, sixty per cent of the taxes paid
during the third tax year, fifty per cent of the taxes paid
during the fourth tax year, forty per cent of the taxes paid
during the fifth tax year, thirty per cent of the taxes paid
during the sixth tax year, and twenty per cent of the taxes paid
during each of the seventh [year.], eighth, and ninth tax years.
For qualified businesses engaged in the manufacturing of
tangible personal property or the producing or processing of
2026-2431 SB2360 GDI SMA-2.docx 12
iiiiiiwiiiioiiHiiiiiinnH

Page 13
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
agricultural products, the credit shall continue after the
[oGvonth] ninth tax year in an amount equal to twenty per cent
of the taxes paid during each of the subsequent three tax
years."
SECTION 8. Section 209E-11, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§209E-ll State general excise exenptions. The department
shall certify annually to the department of taxation that any
qualified business is exempt from the payment of general excise
taxes on the gross proceeds from an eligible business activity
as defined in this chapter; provided that agricultural
businesses other than those engaged in the production of
genetically-engineered agricultural products shall not be exempt
from the payment of general excise taxes on the gross proceeds
IS of agricultural retail sales. The gross proceeds received by a
contractor licensed under chapter 444 shall be exempt from the
general excise tax for construction within an enterprise zone
performed for a qualified business within an enterprise zone or
a business that has been approved by the department to enroll
into the enterprise zone program. The exemption shall extend
for a period not to exceed [eeveft] nij^ years; provided that for
2026-2431 SB2360 CDl SMA-2.docx 13
lUilllllllllMIIMIigiHllliHII

Page 14 2360
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D.2
C.D. 1
qualified businesses engaged in the manufacturing of tangible
personal property or the producing or processing of agricultural
products, the exemption shall extend for a period not to exceed
[-teft] twelve years; provided further that if a force majeure
event occurs, then the period of time shall be tolled until the
force majeure event ceases."
PART III
SECTION 9. This Act shall apply to all qualified
businesses, as defined in section 209E-2, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, that join the enterprise zone program on or after the
effective date of this Act.
SECTION 10. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 11. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026;
provided that:
(1) Section 7 shall apply to taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2026; and
(2) Section 8 shall take effect on January 1, 2028.
2026-2431 SB2360 CDl SMA-2.docx
fflilllllllllilllllHinWIiBIII

S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 6th day of July , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 2360, S.D. 1, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
227-26

SB No. 2360, SD 1, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives